apertium-bho.bho.dix
    <pardef n="/बानी__vbser">
      <e><p><l>होई</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होब</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होई</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होब</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>होई</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होब</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होई</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होब</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>होई</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होब</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होई</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होब</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>होखेवाला</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होखेवाले</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होखेवाला</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होखेवाले</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>होखे</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होखे</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होखे</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>बानी</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>बानी</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>बानी</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>बाड़</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>बाड़</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>बाड़न</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>बाड़न</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>हुए</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!--NS-->
      
      <e><p><l>होख</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होख</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होत</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होत</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होत</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होत</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होके</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>रहलन</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>रहलनी</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>रहले</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>रहलने</l><r>बानी<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="हाथ__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="सद/्__n_m">
      <e><p><l>्</l><r>्<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्</l><r>्<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्</l><r>्<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ों</l><r>्<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ऋ__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="हठ/ी__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ियाँ</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ियों</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ध/ा__n_m"> <!--same as hindi-->
      <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ों</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

     <pardef n="इ__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>यों</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="थ/ू__n_m">               
   	  <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ुओं</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="क/ई__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>इयाँ</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>इयों</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="कहनी__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>    
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="लघु__adj"> <!--<pardef n="स/ा__adj">-->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="मूत"><i>मूत</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="कहनी"><i>कहनी</i><par n="कहनी__n"/></e>
    <e lm="बच्चा"><i>बच्च</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="तौर"><i>तौर</i><par n="कहनी__n"/></e>
    <e lm="अंतराल"><i>अंतराल</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="खोज"><i>खोज</i><par n="कहनी__n"/></e>
    <e lm="घरे"><i>घरे</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="कुछू"><i>कुछू</i><par n="लघु__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="तनिक"><i>तनिक</i><par n="लघु__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बढ़िया"><i>बढ़िया</i><par n="लघु__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सुंदर"><i>सुंदर</i><par n="लघु__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="थी"><i>थी</i><par n="/बानी__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="खेला"><i>खेला</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="छोट"><i>छोट</i><par n="लघु__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बाधा"><i>बाधा</i><par n="कहनी__n"/></e>
    <e lm="गरम"><i>गरम</i><par n="लघु__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लूलू"><i>लूलू</i><par n="लघु__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खैका"><i>खैका</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="नीक"><i>नीक</i><par n="लघु__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लइकी"><i>लइकी</i><par n="कहनी__n"/></e>
    <e lm="कुकुर"><i>कुकुर</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="लकम"><i>लकम</i><par n="कहनी__n"/></e>
    <e lm="बिलार"><i>बिलार</i><par n="कहनी__n"/></e>
    <e lm="महतारी"><i>महतारी</i><par n="कहनी__n"/></e>
    <e lm="रोशनदान"><i>रोशनदान</i><par n="कहनी__n"/></e>
    <e lm="जल्दी"><i>जल्दी</i><par n="कहनी__n"/></e>
    <e lm="लोगो"><i>लोगो</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बानी"><i></i><par n="/बानी__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="कुर्सी"><i>कुर्सी</i><par n="कहनी__n"/></e>
    <e lm="आवाज"><i>आवाज</i><par n="कहनी__n"/></e>
    <e lm="बड़हन"><i>बड़हन</i><par n="लघु__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अपना"><i>अपन</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अँचरा"><i>अँचरा</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="असरा"><i>असरा</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="उलथा"><i>उलथा</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="कान्ह"><i>कान्ह</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="अगम"><i>अगम</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अगिला"><i>अगिला</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अटपटाह"><i>अटपटाह</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अंग्रेज"><i>जहवा</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="जगह"><i>जगह</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="चिट्ठी"><i>चिट्ठी</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="नाना"><i>नाना</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="क्रान्तिकारी"><i>क्रान्तिकारी</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="वाला"><i>वाल</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="कारतूस"><i>कारतूस</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="सवाल"><i>सवाल</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="दिन"><i>दिन</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="राजा"><i>राजा</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="वजह"><i>वजह</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="शुरुआत"><i>शुरुआत</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मुगल"><i>मुगल</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="विषय"><i>विषय</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ईलाका"><i>ईलाका</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="सिंह"><i>सिंह</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="सन्"><i>सन</i><par n="सद/्__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="लॉर्ड"><i>लॉर्ड</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="दुश्मन"><i>दुश्मन</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="आदमी"><i>आदमी</i><par n="इ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="सेनापति"><i>सेनापति</i><par n="इ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="गुप्ता"><i>गुप्त</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="हिन्दू"><i>हिन्द</i><par n="थ/ू__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="पुस्तिका"><i>पुस्तिक</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="अपना"><i>अपन</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बटवारा"><i>बटवारा</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बलिदान"><i>बलिदान</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मरद"><i>मरद</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रकार"><i>प्रकार</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="आदेश"><i>आदेश</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="पेड़"><i>पेड़</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="केवड़ा"><i>केवड़</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="उज्जरा"><i>उज्जर</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="स्वतंत्रता"><i>स्वतंत्रत</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ईसाई"><i>ईसा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="भाई"><i>भा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="हिनु"><i>हिनु</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बागी"><i>बाग</i><par n="हठ/ी__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="नारा"><i>नार</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="दा"><i>द</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="दस्तावेज"><i>दस्तावेज</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="आग्रह"><i>आग्रह</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="सुझाव"><i>सुझाव</i><par n="हाथ__n_m"/></e>
